Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1716
Suburban regulations; exceptions.

Any regulation of any municipality pertaining to any area outside of its corporate limits shall be subject to any lawful and existing regulation of another municipality pertaining to that same area except as otherwise provided by an agreement entered into pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency Act. However, any area annexed by any municipality shall only be subject to the ordinances of such annexing municipality after such annexation.

Laws 1967, c. 75, § 6, p. 245;

Laws 1998, LB 611, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 63;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 100.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Zoning for counties and municipalities are governed by different statutes, and the provisions to eliminate overlapping refer to municipalities only. Seward County Board of Commissioners v. City of Seward, 196 Neb. 266, 242 N.W.2d 849 (1976).